Colorado, session 2026A, HB1323.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Colorado faces escalating risks from drought and
high-intensity wildfires;
(b) Scientific research demonstrates that beaver activity plays a
vital role in reducing wildfire intensity, facilitating wildfire recovery,
protecting water quality, and improving drought and landscape resilience;
(c) The beaver is a keystone species that serves as an ecological
engineer, whose habitat can provide refuge to wildlife from wildfires,
facilitate the recovery of imperiled species, and foster plant community
resilience;
(d) Wetlands created by beavers act as natural firebreaks that
maintain green vegetation and water storage even under severe drought
and fire conditions;
(e) According to the United States forest service, a lack of beaver
populations across the western United States has contributed to increased
wildfires in dry landscapes;
(f) Colorado's public lands contain many of the headwaters,
streams, and riparian corridors that face a high risk of moderate- to
high-intensity wildfire and are where beaver-created wetlands can provide
critical natural wildfire breaks and post-wildfire refuge;
(g) By conserving beaver populations and facilitating beaver
recolonization on public lands, Colorado can strengthen natural fire
defenses, safeguard watersheds, and reduce long-term firefighting and
recovery costs;
-2- HB26-1323

(h) Recognizing the state's budgetary constraints, beavers provide
a cost-free service that provides extensive economic benefits to the state
by assisting in the state's fight against escalating and destructive wildfires;
and
(i) Recognizing the Colorado division of parks and wildlife's
ongoing statewide beaver planning efforts, the division is not the sole
authority responsible for wildfire and watershed resilience on public
lands, and planning alone does not ensure the protection of beaver
populations necessary to achieve wildfire, watershed, and drought
resilience benefits; therefore, the state has an independent obligation to
take timely and enforceable action to reduce escalating wildfire risk.
(2) The general assembly therefore declares that, as part of
Colorado's wildfire resiliency strategy, it is critical for the state to
conserve beavers on public land by prohibiting the taking of beavers for
a recreational purpose or commerce in beaver fur, parts, or products on
public land in the state.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 33-6-133 as
follows:
33-6-133. Prohibition on the recreational or commercial
taking of beavers on public land for wildfire resiliency - exceptions
- rules - penalty - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "BRUNOT AGREEMENT" MEANS THE AGREEMENT OF
SEPTEMBER 13, 1873, RATIFIED BY ACT OF APRIL 29, 1874, CH. 136, 18
STAT. 36 (1874).
(b) "BRUNOT AREA" MEANS THE LAND RELINQUISHED AND
-3- HB26-1323

CONVEYED BY THE CONFEDERATED BANDS OF THE UTE NATION TO THE
UNITED STATES IN THE BRUNOT AGREEMENT AND UPON WHICH THE
UNITED STATES AGREED TO PERMIT THE UTE INDIANS TO HUNT "SO LONG
AS THE GAME LASTS AND THE INDIANS ARE AT PEACE WITH THE WHITE
PEOPLE."
(c) "ENROLLED TRIBAL MEMBER" MEANS AN ENROLLED MEMBER
OF A FEDERALLY RECOGNIZED TRIBE.
(d) (I) "PUBLIC LAND" MEANS FEDERAL AND STATE-MANAGED
LANDS IN THE STATE, INCLUDING LANDS MANAGED BY THE UNITED STATES
FOREST SERVICE AND LANDS MANAGED BY THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF LAND
MANAGEMENT.
(II) "PUBLIC LAND" INCLUDES THE PORTION OF A LAKE, POND,
RIVER, STREAM, OR OTHER WATER BODY THAT IS WITHIN THE BOUNDS OF
PUBLIC LAND.
(e) (I) "TAKE" MEANS TO WOUND OR KILL A BEAVER.
(II) "TAKE" DOES NOT INCLUDE THE ACCIDENTAL WOUNDING OR
KILLING OF A BEAVER.
(2) EXCEPT AS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (3) OR (6) OF THIS
SECTION OR EXPRESSLY AUTHORIZED BY FEDERAL LAW, IT IS UNLAWFUL
FOR A PERSON TO TAKE A BEAVER ON PUBLIC LAND FOR A RECREATIONAL
PURPOSE OR COMMERCE IN BEAVER FUR, PARTS, OR PRODUCTS.
(3) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE TAKING OF A BEAVER
ON PUBLIC LAND IF THE TAKING IS CONDUCTED:
(a) FOR A PURPOSE OTHER THAN A RECREATIONAL PURPOSE OR
COMMERCE IN BEAVER FUR, PARTS, OR PRODUCTS SO LONG AS THE FUR,
PARTS, OR PRODUCTS OF THE BEAVER ARE NOT BOUGHT, SOLD, BARTERED,
OR OTHERWISE EXCHANGED FOR PROFIT; OR
-4- HB26-1323

(b) BY AN ENROLLED TRIBAL MEMBER PURSUANT TO A HUNTING,
FISHING, OR TRAPPING RIGHT RESERVED BY FEDERAL LAW, TREATY, OR
PRESIDENTIAL EXECUTIVE ORDER.
(4) THE COMMISSION MAY ADOPT RULES NECESSARY TO
IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION. IF THE COMMISSION ADOPTS RULES, THE
COMMISSION'S RULES MUST ENSURE THAT THE ROLE OF BEAVERS AND
BEAVER-CREATED WETLANDS IN THE WILDFIRE RESILIENCY OF PUBLIC
LAND IS PROTECTED.
(5) A PERSON THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION SHALL BE PENALIZED
BY:
(a) A FINE OF ONE THOUSAND DOLLARS;
(b) A SURCHARGE AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 24-33.5-415.6; AND
(c) AN ASSESSMENT OF TWENTY LICENSE SUSPENSION POINTS.
(6) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO THE
CONTRARY, THIS SECTION DOES NOT:
(a) APPLY TO LANDS WITHIN THE RESERVATION OF A FEDERALLY
RECOGNIZED TRIBE; OR
(b) ALTER THE MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING BETWEEN THE
STATE AND THE SOUTHERN UTE INDIAN TRIBE, DATED JANUARY 2013, OR
THE MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING BETWEEN THE STATE AND THE
UTE MOUNTAIN UTE TRIBE, DATED JANUARY 2013, OR ANY AMENDMENTS
TO THE MEMORANDUMS, REGARDING WILDLIFE MANAGEMENT AND
ENFORCEMENT IN THE BRUNOT AREA PURSUANT TO THE BRUNOT
AGREEMENT.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-415.6,
amend (7) as follows:
24-33.5-415.6. Offender identification - fund.
-5- HB26-1323

(7) A surcharge of two dollars and fifty cents is hereby levied
against each penalty assessment issued pursuant to section 33-6-104,
33-6-133, or 33-15-102 C.R.S., that results in payment of the penalty
assessment without the commencement of a criminal action. All moneys
MONEY collected by the division of parks and wildlife in the department
of natural resources pursuant to this subsection (7) shall be transmitted to
the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the fund.
SECTION 4. Applicability. This act applies to conduct occurring
on or after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-6- HB26-1323